District of Columbia statutes.
21-585

Confinement in jail prohibited.

A person apprehended, detained, or hospitalized under any provision of this chapter may not be confined in jail or in a penal or correctional institution.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 760, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Section References

This section is referenced in § 21-589.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-585.
1973 Ed., § 21-585.